Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2406
Interpreters;
fees and expenses.

The fees and expenses of an
interpreter shall be fixed and ordered paid by the judge before whom such
proceeding takes place, in accordance with a fee schedule established by the
Supreme Court, and be paid out of the General Fund with funds appropriated
to the Supreme Court for that purpose or
from other funds, including grant money, made available to the Supreme Court
for such purpose.

Laws 1973, LB 116, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 54, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 18.